New York, session 2025-2026, A3150.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new 2 section 387 to read as follows: 3 § 387. Prohibition of importing, possessing or selling any kangaroo 4 product for commercial purposes. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision 5 of law, it shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly import any part 6 or product of the skin or body of a kangaroo, knowingly possess any part 7 or product of the skin or body of a kangaroo with intent to sell, or 8 knowingly sell any part or product of the skin or body of a kangaroo, 9 for commercial purposes, or knowingly attempt to import, possess, or 10 sell any part or product of the skin or body of a kangaroo, for commer- 11 cial purposes. 12 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall be unlawful 13 for any person to direct another person to knowingly import any part or 14 product of the skin or body of a kangaroo, knowingly possess any part or 15 product of the skin or body of a kangaroo with intent to sell, or know- 16 ingly sell any part or product of the skin or body of a kangaroo, for 17 commercial purposes, or direct another person to attempt to knowingly 18 import, possess, or sell any part or product of the skin or body of a 19 kangaroo, for commercial purposes. 20 3. A violation of this section shall be punishable by a civil penalty 21 of up to one thousand dollars for the first offense and five thousand 22 dollars for any subsequent violation. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05254-01-5 A. 3150 2 1 4. The provisions of this section shall be in addition to, and not in 2 lieu of, any other laws protecting animal welfare. This section shall 3 not be construed to limit any state law or rules protecting the welfare 4 of animals or to prevent a local governing body from adopting and 5 enforcing its own animal welfare laws and regulations. Nothing in this 6 section shall prohibit a person from otherwise lawful disposition of a 7 deceased kangaroo or any part or product of the skin or body of such 8 kangaroo. 9 5. If any provision of this section, or the application thereof to any 10 person or circumstances, is held invalid or unconstitutional, such inva- 11 lidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or 12 applications of this section that can be given effect without the inval- 13 id or unconstitutional provision or application, and to such end the 14 provisions of this section shall be severable. 15 6. For purposes of this section: 16 (a) The term "any part or product of the skin or body of a kangaroo" 17 shall include, but not be limited to, the animal's viscera, skin, hide, 18 meat, or bones; 19 (b) The term "person" shall mean an individual, corporation, partner- 20 ship, trust, association, or other legal activity; 21 (c) The term "commercial purposes" shall mean the advancement of a 22 person's economic interests, such as by inducing another person to buy, 23 rent, lease, join, subscribe to, provide, or exchange products, goods, 24 property, information, or services, or enabling or effecting, directly 25 or indirectly, a transaction or other undertaking intended for profit; 26 and 27 (d) The term "kangaroo" shall include any of the following: 28 (i) an osphranter rufus, commonly known as a red kangaroo; 29 (ii) a macropus giganteus, commonly known as an eastern grey kangaroo; 30 (iii) a macropus fuliginosus, commonly known as a western grey kanga- 31 roo; or 32 (iv) an osphranter robustus, commonly known as the common wallaroo. 33 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 34 it shall have become a law.